Hawaii, session 2025, SB1061.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that digital equity in every community across the State is essential to the well-being and economic reality of the State's residents.  The lack of digital equity is a pressing community issue in Hawaii, and isolates those in rural and socio-economically disadvantaged communities.  This inequality creates a digital divide, that is especially exacerbated amongst the State's most vulnerable and underserved populations. The legislature also finds that digital equity has meant the difference between an employee being able to work remotely and an employee possibly facing unemployment.  Additionally, digital literacy and broadband access are critical tools for persons seeking to access social services, such as unemployment claims; supplemental nutrition assistance program benefits; vital records; and other essential government, educational, and medical services. The legislature further finds that digital equity in the State will enhance Hawaii's overall economic development and education, health care, and emergency services. The purpose of this Act is to establish and appropriate funds for a digital navigator pilot program to offer technical assistance with computers and electronic devices to residents. SECTION 2.  (a) The Hawaii broadband and digital equity office shall establish a two-year navigator pilot program that offers technical assistance with computers and electronic devices for members of the public. (b)  The Hawaii broadband and digital equity office may partner with the Hawaii state public library system and other state agencies for the purposes of the pilot program. (c)  The digital navigator pilot program shall have two locations on the island of Oahu, two locations on the island of Hawaii, one location on the island of Kauai, one location on the island of Maui, one location on the island of Molokai, and one location on the island of Lanai. (d)  The Hawaii broadband and digital equity office shall submit a report of the pilot program's feasibility and impact, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2027. SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the broadband and digital equity special fund established pursuant to Act , Session Laws of Hawaii 2025, the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to establish a digital navigator pilot program pursuant to this Act. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the Hawaii broadband and digital equity office for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2050.